Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-705
Right-of-way; condemnation; procedure.

Any telecommunications company may enter upon private lands to survey the lands for the purpose of obtaining a right-of-way. Every owner of an interest in private lands to be occupied by any telecommunications lines shall be compensated for any right-of-way appropriated pursuant to sections 86-701 to 86-707. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1931, c. 158, § 1, p. 419;

Laws 1941, c. 193, § 1, p. 762;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 86-301;

Laws 1943, c. 231, § 1, p. 778;

R.S.1943, § 86-302;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 123, p. 504;

Laws 1999, LB 496, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-302;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 410.